ko: 피자 팬 스타일: 쿠페 팬; 딥디쉬; 디트로이트 스타일; 구멍 뚫림; 화면; 쟁반; 시칠리아 스타일; 솔리드; 기타
nl: Pizzapanstijl: Randloze pizzabakplaat; Diepe pan; Detroit-stijl; Geperforeerd; Scherm; Serveerschaal; Siciliaanse stijl; Stevig; Overig
fr: Style de moule à pizza: Coupe pan; Plat profond; Style Détroit; Perforé; Écran; Plateau de service; Style sicilien; Solide; Autre
zh-TW: 披薩烤盤樣式: 圓弧烤盤; 深烤盤; 底特律風格; 穿孔式; 篩網; 托盤; 西西里風格; 實心; 其他
en: Pizza pan style: Coupe pan; Deep dish; Detroit style; Perforated; Screen; Serving tray; Sicilian style; Solid; Other
sk-SK: Dizajn formy na pizzu: Okrúhla panvica bez okrajov; Hlboká panvica; Detroitský štýl; Perforovaná; Sieťka; Servírovací podnos; Sicílsky štýl; Pevná; Iné
th: รูปแบบของกระทะพิซซ่า: ทรงขอบเตี้ยโค้งมน; พิซซ่าทรงลึก; พิซซ่าสไตล์ดีทรอยต์; แบบเจาะรู; หน้าจอ; ถาดเสิร์ฟ; พิซซ่าสไตล์ซิซิลี; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Estilo da forma de pizza: Cupê; Prato fundo; Estilo Detroit; Perfurado; Cortina; Bandeja para servir; Estilo siciliano; Maciço; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на тава за пица: Плитка тава; Дълбока тава; Детройтски стил; Перфорирано; Мрецеста тава; Поднос за сервиране; Сицилиански стил; Плътно; Друго
es: Estilo de molde para pizza: Plato grande; Plato hondo; Estilo Detroit; Perforado; Pantalla; Bandeja; Estilo siciliano; Sólido; Otros
sv: Pizzapanna-stil: Coupépanna; Djup tallrik; Detroit-stil; Perforerad; Skärm; Serveringsfat; Siciliansk stil; Solid; Övrigt
zh-CN: 披萨盘的样式: 圆顶盘; 深盘; 底特律风格; 打孔; 网盘; 托盘; 西西里风格; 实心; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo da forma de pizza: Forma de corte; Prato fundo; Estilo Detroit; Perfurado; Tela; Bandeja para servir; Estilo siciliano; Sólido; Outro
hr-HR: Stil pleha za pizzu: Posuda s ravnim rubom; Duboka posuda; Detroitski stil; Perforirani; Pregrada; Poslužavnik; Sicilijanski stil; Čvrsti; Ostalo
ja: ピザパンのスタイル: クーペパン; ディープディッシュ; デトロイトスタイル; ミシン目; スクリーン; お盆・トレイ; シチリア風; ソリッド; その他
fi: Pizzapannun tyyli: Coupe-pannu; Deep dish; Detroit-pannu; Rei'itetty; Näyttö; Tarjotin; Sisilialainen pannu; Kiinteä; Muu
lt-LT: Picos kepimo formos tipas: Coupe forma; Gilus indas; Detroito stilius; Perforuotas; Sienelė; Serviravimo padėklas; Sicilietiškas stilius; Kietas; Kita
tr: Pizza tavası stili: Coupe tava; Derin kenarlı; Detroit tarzı; Perfore; Tel tepsi; Servis tepsisi; Sicilya tarzı; Düz; Diğer
it: Stile teglia per pizza: Coupé pan; Piatto profondo; Stile Detroit; Perforata; Schermo; Vassoio da portata; Stile siciliano; Solido; Altro
de: Pizzablechstil: Coupé-Pfanne; Deep Dish; Detroit-Stil; Perforiert; Abtrennung; Serviertablett; Sizilianischer Stil; Solide; Sonstiges
da: Pizzapandes udformning: Coupé-pande; Dyb dish; Detroit-stil; Perforeret; Skærm; Serveringsbakke; Siciliansk stil; Solid; Andet
pl: Typ formy do pizzy: Forma coupe; Deep dish; Styl Detroit; Perforowane; Siatkowe; Taca do serwowania; Styl sycylijski; Pełne; Pozostałe
vi: Kiểu khuôn bánh pizza: Khay nướng kiểu Coupe; Kiểu lòng sâu; Kiểu Detroit; Đục lỗ; Màn hình; Khay đựng đồ ăn; Kiểu Sicilia; Rắn; Khác
nb: Pizzapanne-stil: Coupé-panne; Dyp tallerken; Detroit-stil; Perforert; Skjerm; Serveringsbrett; Siciliansk stil; Fast; Annet
ru: Тип формы для пиццы: С низким бортиком; Глубокая тарелка; Детройтский стиль; С перфорированным дном; С сетчатым дном; Поднос для подачи; Сицилийский стиль; С цельным дном; Другое
cs: Styl plechu na pizzu: Plochý bez okraje; Hluboký plech; Na detroitskou pizzu; Perforovaný povrch; Síto; Servírovací plech; Na sicilskou pizzu; Plný povrch (bez perforací); Jiné
ro-RO: Stilul unei tăvi de pizza: Tavă cupă; Vas adânc; Stil Detroit; Perforată; Plasă; Tavă de servire; Stil sicilian; Solidă; Altele
hu: Pizzasütő stílus: Talpas serpenyő; Mély tál; Detroiti stílus; Perforált; Függöny; Tálalótálca; Szicíliai stílus; Szilárd; Egyéb
el: Στυλ ταψιού πίτσας: Τηγάνι κουπών; Βαθύ πιάτο; Στυλ Ντιτρόιτ; Διάτρητο; Σίτα; Δίσκος σερβιρίσματος; Σικελικό στυλ; Συμπαγές; Άλλο
sl-SI: Slog pekača za pico: Ponev za kupe; Globoka posoda; Detroitski slog; Perforirana; Steklena pregrada; Servirni pladenj; Sicilijanski slog; Trden; Druga